Hawaii statutes.
D. Miscellaneous

Cross References

Civil relief for state military forces, see chapter 657D.

Disposition of state boating facility properties, see
§200-2.5.

§171-50 Exchanges. (a) Purpose. No
exchange of public land for private land shall be made except for public
purposes, including but not limited to (1) consolidation of holdings of public
lands; (2) straightening of boundaries of public lands; (3) acquisition of
adequate access for landlocked public lands which have development potential; or
(4) acquisition of lands suitable for residential use. Exchanges shall be
effected without public auction. Public notice of any proposed exchange shall
be given in accordance with the applicable provisions set forth in section
171-16(d). All private lands conveyed to the State by way of exchanges shall
thereafter become public lands.

(b) Value. The public land exchanged shall be
of substantially equal value to that of the private land. In any exchange, the
fair market value of the private land and the public land shall be separately
determined by a disinterested qualified appraiser or appraisers and the cost
shall be borne equally between the owner and the board. No payment by the
State shall be required should the private land exceed the value of the public
land, but any difference in value of the public land over the private land
shall be paid to the State at the time of the exchange; provided no exchange
shall be made should public land exceed one hundred twenty per cent of the
value of the private land.

(c) Legislative approval. Any exchange of
public land for private land shall be subject to approval by majority vote of
both houses of the legislature in any regular or special session following the
date of the board of land and natural resources' approval in principle of the
exchange. The state department or agency shall submit for introduction to the
legislature a resolution for review of action on any exchange to be consummated
by the board wherein exchange deeds will be executed by the parties together
with the following information:

(1) The specific location and size in square feet or
in other precise measure of the parcels of land to be exchanged;

(2) The value of the lands to be conveyed by the
State and the private party;

(3) The name or names of the appraiser or appraisers;

(4) The date of the appraisal valuation;

(5) The purpose for which the lands are being
exchanged;

(6) A detailed summary of any development plans for
the land to be exchanged; and

(7) A statement of whether the land is, or is not,
land that was classed as government or crown lands previous to August 15, 1895,
or was acquired by the State in exchange for such lands, and a detailed
explanation of how the state department or agency made this determination.

A copy of the draft resolution shall also be
submitted to the office of Hawaiian affairs at least three months prior to the
convening of a regular or special session of the legislature to allow the
office to determine whether the land was classed as government or crown lands
previous to August 15, 1895, or was acquired by the State in exchange for such
lands.

(d) Exception. Notwithstanding any
limitations set forth in this section, the board may exchange public land for
Hawaiian homes commission's available land of equal value in order to
consolidate its holdings or the holdings of the commission or to effectuate
better the purposes of this chapter or of the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act of
1920, as amended. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; am L 1965, c 239, §25; Supp, §103A-47;
am L 1967, c 234, §3; HRS §171-50; am L 1969, c 281, §1; am L 1970, c 184, §4;
am L 1972, c 175, §1; am L 1975, c 69, §§1, 2; am L 1977, c 17, §1; am L 2003,
c 75, §1; am L 2009, c 176, §3; am L 2011, c 169, §1; am L 2014, c 146, §1]

Case Notes

Claim for relief against state officials based on alleged
illegality of exchange of ceded lands was barred by State's sovereign
immunity. 73 H. 578, 837 P.2d 1247.

Law Journals and Reviews

Courts in the "Age of Reconciliation": Office of
Hawaiian Affairs v. HCDCH. 33 UH L. Rev. 503 (2011).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next